New York, session 2025-2026, S9945.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known as the "Health Equity for Retirees 2 Act" or "(HERA)". 3 § 2. 1. On and after the effective date of this act, a public employer 4 shall not diminish the health insurance benefits provided to retirees 5 and their Medicare-eligible dependents or the contributions such employ- 6 er makes for such health insurance coverage below the level of such 7 benefits or contributions made on behalf of such retirees and their 8 dependents by such public employer as of December 31, 2021. Nothing in 9 this subdivision shall be construed to impair the ability of any employ- 10 ee organization to negotiate the terms and conditions of employment for 11 their employee members. 12 2. For the purposes of this act: 13 (a) "diminish" shall mean any change in health care offered that could 14 potentially make it harder for retirees residing anywhere within the 15 United States, including its territories and possessions, to access 16 their health care than before such change was made. These changes shall 17 include, but are not limited to, increasing the cost of such health care 18 (including with respect to premiums, deductibles, coinsurance, and 19 copayments), reducing contributions made by a public employer, forcing 20 retirees into Medicare Advantage Plans, forcing them to use health care 21 providers only from pre-designated panels, or forcing them to wait for 22 pre-authorization for medical procedures that are recommended by their 23 health care providers; 24 (b) "health care benefits" shall mean any and all aspects of health 25 care coverage offered to retirees and their Medicare-eligible dependents 26 by public employers, including, but not limited to: (i) costs: this 27 includes the amount of money (on either an absolute or proportional EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07760-02-5 S. 9945 2 1 basis) retirees and their Medicare-eligible dependents are charged for 2 premiums, deductibles, coinsurance, and copayments associated with any 3 health care coverage; (ii) coverage: this encompasses the specific 4 services and benefits covered by the health care plan, including inpa- 5 tient and outpatient care, preventative services, prescription drugs, 6 mental health and substance abuse treatment, and vision and dental care; 7 and (iii) provider choice: this includes the ability of retirees and 8 their Medicare-eligible dependents to access any health care provider 9 who accepts Medicare or participates in the offered plan's network, 10 without restriction; 11 (c) "public employer" shall mean the following: (i) the state or a 12 civil division thereof; (ii) a county, city, town or village; (iii) a 13 school district, board of cooperative educational services, vocational 14 education and extension board or a school district as enumerated in 15 section 1 of chapter 566 of the laws of 1967, as amended; (iv) any 16 governmental entity operating a college or university; (v) a public 17 improvement or special district including police or fire districts; (vi) 18 a public authority, commission or public benefit corporation; or (vii) 19 any other public corporation, agency, instrumentality or unit of govern- 20 ment which exercises governmental power under the laws of this state; 21 and 22 (d) "retiree" shall mean a Medicare-eligible retiree of a public 23 employer. 24 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 25 have been in full force and effect on and after December 31, 2021.